Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1407
Revivor; procedure; motion.

The order may be made on the motion of the adverse party, or of the representatives or successor of the party who died, or whose powers ceased, suggesting his death or the cessation of his powers, which, with the names and capacities of his representatives or successor, shall be stated in the order.

R.S.1867, Code § 460, p. 470;

R.S.1913, § 8028;

C.S.1922, § 8969;

C.S.1929, § 20-1407;

R.S.1943, § 25-1407.

Procedure for revivor is provided for actions that do not abate. Workman v. Workman, 167 Neb. 857, 95 N.W.2d 186 (1959).

Provisions of the civil code relative to abatement and revivor of actions are applicable to revivor of actions in Supreme Court. Keefe v. Grace, 142 Neb. 330, 6 N.W.2d 59 (1942).

Action for personal injuries does not abate by death, and administrator may revive. Murray v. Omaha Transfer Co., 95 Neb. 175, 145 N.W. 360 (1914), on rehearing, 98 Neb. 482, 153 N.W. 488 (1915).

Party having no interest in litigation adverse to deceased party cannot make motion. Jameson v. Bartlett, 63 Neb. 638, 88 N.W. 860 (1902).